gc_lang/fr/dictionnaire/orthographe/FRANCAIS_7.aff
FLAG long
# Participes passés invariables
SFX q. Y 9
SFX q.   enir       enu/d'q'                    enir                po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   tir        ti/d'q'                     tir                 po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   courir     couru/d'q'                  courir              po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   ivre       écu/d'q'                    vivre               po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   aire       u/d'q'                      aire                po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   dre        du/d'q'                     dre                 po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   valoir     valu/d'q'                   .valoir             po:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX q.   aître      u/d'q'                      aître               po:ppas is:epi is:inv     di:M
SFX q.   aitre      u/d'q'                      aitre               po:ppas is:epi is:inv     di:R

# FIN #################################################################################################################
